Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
Chapter 21. Mississippi Craft Center

§ 39-21-1.
Legislative intent.

The Legislature recognizes the need for a craft center in Mississippi to enable Mississippi craft persons to demonstrate their skills and display their creations to Mississippians and tourists from other states. The Legislature further recognizes that a craft center would be of great economic and cultural importance to Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 501, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 39-21-3.
Mississippi craft center; location; construction.

A facility to house the Mississippi Craft Center may be located within the corporate limits of Ridgeland, Mississippi.

Consideration for the purchase of the property described in subsection (1) of this section necessary for the construction of the facility to house the Mississippi Craft Center shall not exceed the average of the fair market price for such real property as determined by two (2) professional property appraisers selected by the Department of Finance and Administration and certified and licensed by the Mississippi Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Board. Appraisal fees shall be paid by the Department of Finance and Administration from the proceeds of the bonds issued pursuant to Chapter 501, Laws of 1997.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 501, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 457, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 19, 2000.).

§ 39-21-4.
“Mississippi Craft Center” renamed the “William Lowe (Bill) Waller, Sr. Craft Center.”

The MississippiCraft Center established under authority of Section 39-21-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, located within Ridgeland, Madison County, Mississippi,and under the jurisdiction of the Department of Finance and Administrationand leased to The Craftsmen’s Guild of Mississippi, Inc., shallbe renamed the “William Lowe (Bill) Waller, Sr. Craft Center.”

The Departmentof Finance and Administration shall prepare or have prepared a distinctiveplaque to be placed in a prominent place within the William Lowe (Bill)Waller, Sr. Craft Center that states the background, accomplishmentsand service to the state of the Honorable William Lowe (Bill) Waller,Sr. The Department of Finance and Administration, in conjunction withThe Craftsmen’s Guild of Mississippi, Inc., shall erect orcause to be erected proper lettering or signage on the outdoor facadeof the Craft Center displaying the official name of the building asthe “William Lowe (Bill) Waller, Sr. Craft Center.”The Department of Finance and Administration may expend all fundsnecessary to accomplish this act from funds appropriated by the Legislaturefor such purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 375, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 39-21-5.
Authority of Department of Finance and Administration to Construct Mississippi Craft Center.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall proceed with the purchase of necessary property, and constructing, furnishing and equipping a facility to house the Mississippi Craft Center as soon as practicable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 501, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 39-21-7.
Lease or operating agreement with Mississippi Craftmen’s Guild.

Upon completion of the construction, furnishing and equipping of the facility to house the Mississippi Craft Center as provided for in this chapter, the Department of Finance and Administration shall enter into a lease, sublease or operating agreement for a period not exceeding twenty (20) years, with The Craftsmen’s Guild of Mississippi, Inc. whereunder The Craftsmen’s Guild of Mississippi, Inc., shall assume exclusive responsibilities for operating the facility. The benefit to Mississippi from the operation of such lease, sublease or operating agreement shall be considered as sufficient consideration. The lease, sublease or operating agreement shall be executed for a nominal fee and it shall be presumed that such lease shall not amount to a donation of state property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 501, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1997.